Hawaii statutes.
[§321-512] Compassionate care. (a)
Any hospital at which a female sexual assault victim presents for emergency
services shall:

(1) Provide any female sexual assault victim with
medically and factually accurate and unbiased written and oral information
about emergency contraception;

(2) Orally inform each female sexual assault victim
of the option to receive emergency contraception at the hospital;

(3) When medically indicated, offer emergency
contraception to each female sexual assault victim;

(4) Dispense a complete course of emergency
contraception to each female sexual assault victim who accepts or requests it;
and

(5) Ensure that providers who may prescribe or
administer emergency contraception shall be trained to provide a female sexual
assault victim with medically and factually accurate and unbiased written and
oral information about emergency contraception and sexual assault treatment
options and access to emergency contraception.

(b) No hospital shall deny a female sexual
assault victim emergency contraception based on a refusal to undergo a forensic
examination or a refusal to report the alleged sexual assault to law
enforcement.

(c) No hospital shall be required to dispense
emergency contraception to a female sexual assault victim who has been
determined to be pregnant through the administration by the hospital staff of a
pregnancy test approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

(d) If private insurance is not or cannot be
utilized for payment, the cost of any emergency contraception dispensed
pursuant to this part shall be paid by the department of human services. [L
2013, c 27, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next